Maryland, session 2026, HB0516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
2–111.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR RECEIVING, REVIEWING, AND
INVESTIGATING COMPLAINTS REGARDING MATTERS UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF
THE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0516*

HOUSE BILL 516
WASTE, AND BEHAVIOR THAT THREATENS PUBLIC SAFETY OR DEMONSTRATES
NEGLIGENCE, INCOMPETENCE, OR MALFEASANCE; AND
(2) COOPERATE WITH AND COORDINATE INVESTIGATIVE EFFORTS
WITH:
(I) THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND, WHEN A PRELIMINARY INVESTIGATION
ESTABLISHES A SUFFICIENT BASIS TO WARRANT A REFERRAL, SHALL REFER
MATTERS TO THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
(II) UNITS IN THE DEPARTMENT AND OTHER STATE AND
FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SEND A
WRITTEN RESPONSE TO THE COMPLAINANT:
(I) WITHIN 7 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER RECEIPT IF THE
COMPLAINT ALLEGES UNLICENSED OR UNSAFE ACTIVITY THAT POSES AN IMMINENT
RISK TO PUBLIC SAFETY;
(II) WITHIN 14 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER RECEIPT IF THE
COMPLAINT ALLEGES WAGE THEFT, WORKER MISCLASSIFICATION, OR
PROFESSIONAL MISCONDUCT; AND
(III) WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER RECEIPT IF THE
COMPLAINT ALLEGES ADMINISTRATIVE OR RECORD–KEEPING DEFICIENCIES.
(2) A RESPONSE TO A COMPLAINANT BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL STATE:
(I) WHETHER THE DEPARTMENT IS ABLE TO INVESTIGATE THE
COMPLAINT; AND
(II) IF THE DEPARTMENT IS UNABLE TO INVESTIGATE THE
COMPLAINT:
1. THE REASONS FOR THE INABILITY TO INVESTIGATE;
AND
2. THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE DIVISION OF
CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.

HOUSE BILL 516 3
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INITIATE A PRELIMINARY
FACT–FINDING INVESTIGATION ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT IN A MANNER AND
WITHIN A TIME FRAME SUFFICIENT TO PREVENT THE LOSS OF EVIDENCE OR A DELAY
IN ENFORCEMENT.
(2) A PRELIMINARY FACT–FINDING INVESTIGATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) VERIFYING LICENSURE, REGISTRATION, PERMIT, AND
CERTIFICATION;
(II) CONDUCTING SITE CHECKS;
(III) REQUESTING RECORDS, INCLUDING PERMITS, PAYROLL
RECORDS, AND WORKER CLASSIFICATION DOCUMENTATION; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INVESTIGATORY ACTION NECESSARY TO
PRESERVE EVIDENCE AND SUBSTANTIATE THE ALLEGATIONS OF A COMPLAINT.
(D) THE INITIATION OF AN INVESTIGATION OF A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS
SECTION DOES NOT CONSTITUTE A FINAL DETERMINATION OF LIABILITY OR AN
ENFORCEMENT ACTION BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EMPLOY ONE INVESTIGATOR FOR EACH
OF THE FOLLOWING REGIONS TO INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION:
(I) WESTERN MARYLAND (ALLEGANY COUNTY, CARROLL
COUNTY, GARRETT COUNTY, AND WASHINGTON COUNTY);
(II) BALTIMORE COUNTY AND BALTIMORE CITY;
(III) THE EASTERN SHORE;
(IV) CENTRAL MARYLAND (ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY,
FREDERICK COUNTY, HARFORD COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY, AND MONTGOMERY
COUNTY); AND
(V) STATEWIDE AND SOUTHERN MARYLAND (CALVERT
COUNTY, CHARLES COUNTY, PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S
COUNTY).

HOUSE BILL 516
(2) EACH INVESTIGATOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$500,000 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT OF FIVE INVESTIGATORS UNDER SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS SPECIFYING PROCESSES
AND PROCEDURES FOR:
(1) THE PRELIMINARY ASSESSMENT OF COMPLAINTS TO PRIORITIZE
THE IDENTIFICATION OF URGENT ISSUES THAT THREATEN PUBLIC OR PERSONAL
SAFETY REQUIRING PRIORITY INVESTIGATION AND RESPONSE;
(2) REFERRING COMPLAINTS TO OTHER DIVISIONS WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT OR OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCIES; AND
(3) DOCUMENTING COMPLAINTS, INVESTIGATIVE FINDINGS, AND
OUTCOMES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.